Wyoming, session 2025, SF0011.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-3-616 is created to read:

6-3-616. Use of fraudulent documents to gain or
remain in possession of property.

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Document" means a writing, whether in
physical, electronic or another form;
SF0011

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0131

(ii) "Property" means residential real property
improved by a dwelling, structure or other building.

(b) A person is guilty of a felony punishable by
imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of
not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both,
if the person intentionally uses a document that the person
knows or reasonably should know is false or fraudulent to
gain or remain in possession of property or to claim a
right to property for which the person does not have a
legal right to possess or claim a right.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0011